Louisiana, session 2026, HB468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1431 (35) through (37) and 1448.5 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1431. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following words have the meaning ascribed to
them in this Section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
* * *
(35) "Residential real property" means real property consisting of one or not
more than four residential dwelling units, which are buildings or structures each of
which is occupied or intended for occupancy as single family residences.
(36) "Wholesaler" means any person or entity that is either engaged in or
intends to engage in the wholesaling of residential real property.
(37) "Wholesaling" means securing, negotiating, or facilitating the purchase
or sale of residential real property with the purpose of transferring, assigning, or
selling a contractual right to purchase or any other equitable interest in the residential
real property, whether directly or indirectly, for financial gain. The marketing for
sale of the contractual rights or other equitable interests constitutes a presumption
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 468 ENROLLED
that the person or entity marketing or selling the rights or interests is engaged in
wholesaling. "Wholesaling" includes but is not limited to the following:
(a) Entering into a contract to purchase residential real property with the
intent of assigning or selling the contractual rights to another party before taking
possession or legal ownership of such residential real property.
(b) Simultaneously consummating or closing two separate transactions
relative to the same residential real property, including one transaction with the
original owner and seller of the residential real property and another transaction with
the end buyer, without the purchaser providing all funds needed to close the sale
transaction with the original owner and seller and without the intent to reside in,
occupy, or otherwise materially improve the residential real property.
* * *
§1448.5. Wholesale agreements; residential real property
A. A wholesaler shall prominently disclose all of the following in writing to
the seller of residential real property, which is the subject of wholesaling, before the
execution of each related contract or written agreement:
(1) That the wholesaler has an intent to assign, transfer, convey, or sell the
wholesaler's contractual rights to, or equitable interest in, the subject residential real
property for a higher price than what is offered to the seller, or will otherwise market
the wholesaler's contractual rights or equitable interests for financial gain.
(2) That the seller should seek legal advice before signing each contract or
written agreement relative to the seller's residential real property.
(3) That the seller has the right to cancel any contract or written agreement
relative to the seller's residential real property for any reason and without penalty for
at least five calendar days after the execution of each related contract or written
agreement.
B. A wholesaler shall not directly or indirectly do any of the following:
(1) Act or purport to act as an advisor or consultant or in any other manner
represent that the wholesaler is acting on behalf of the seller whether pursuant to a
mandate, power of attorney, or otherwise.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 468 ENROLLED
(2) Represent himself as holding any license or certification or being a
member of a licensed profession without possession of the license or certification.
(3) Impose, file, record, or place any lien, privilege, mortgage, or other
encumbrance on the residential real property, which is the subject of wholesaling, or
otherwise cloud the title of such property.
(4) Engage in any deceptive or unfair trade practice involving residential real
property or the execution of unlawful real estate service agreements in violation of
R.S. 51:1429.
C.(1) Any seller that enters into a contract or written agreement involving
wholesaling has the right to cancel the contract or written agreement for any reason
and without penalty for at least five calendar days after the date of execution of each
related contract or written agreement by either the seller or the wholesaler,
whichever is later.
(2)(a) Any contract or written agreement involving wholesaling shall
conspicuously include the date and time by which the contract or written agreement
may be canceled by the seller. The date and time shall be included within a notice
which shall be located in immediate proximity to the space reserved for the seller's
signature and shall contain the following language:
"NOTICE REQUIRED BY LOUISIANA LAW: You may cancel this
contract at any time before 11:59 PM of [Insert Date]. [Insert Name of Wholesaler]
CANNOT ask you to sign or have you sign any cash sale, conveyance or deed, or
any other document until your right to cancel this contract has ended. See the
attached notice of cancellation form for an explanation of this right. It is advisable
that you find your own attorney before signing the contract. The law requires this
contract to contain the entire agreement. You should not rely upon any other written
or oral agreement or promise."
(b) The commission shall publish and maintain a mandatory cancellation
notice form on its website, which shall include, at a minimum, the language required
by this Paragraph.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 468 ENROLLED
(c) A wholesaler shall include the mandatory cancellation notice form
required by this Paragraph at no cost to the seller with each contract or written
agreement involving wholesaling.
D.(1) Failure to include any of the required disclosures outlined in this
Section or any other violation of this Section shall render the contract or written
agreement involving wholesaling immediately voidable and terminable at any time
prior to transfer of title of the residential real property by the seller, at the seller's
sole discretion.
(2) Upon seller's written notice to the wholesaler of the seller's election to
void and terminate such contract or written agreement pursuant to Paragraph (1) of
this Subsection, the contract or written agreement shall be invalid and unenforceable
by the wholesaler.
E.(1) Upon a termination by the seller prior to the expiration of the rescission
period outlined in Subsection C of this Section, the wholesaler shall be entitled to
receive a full return of any deposit involved in the wholesaling transaction. Upon any
other termination exercised by a seller in accordance with this Section, the seller
shall be entitled to receive any deposit involved in the wholesaling transaction.
(2) Any deposit involved in a wholesaling transaction shall be kept in either
the account of the seller or an escrow account maintained in this state with a
federally insured financial institution.
(3) Any contract or written agreement involving wholesaling shall include
a deposit of not less than one percent of the purchase price, which shall be held in
escrow in accordance with this Section.
F. Any violation of this Section shall constitute both an unfair trade practice,
which may be enforced by the attorney general, public protection division, consumer
protection section, and a violation of this Chapter, which may be enforced by the
commission.
G. In addition to any other remedy provided by law, any person who violates
the provisions of this Section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five
thousand dollars per violation to be imposed and collected by the commission.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 468 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall not apply to any contracts or written
agreements, regarding the wholesaling of residential real property, that were completed prior
to the effective date of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.